District of Columbia statutes.
47-4609

New Convention Center Hotel project-deed and recordation tax exemption.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area” means the real property located in Lots 18, 21, 22, 24, 801 through 806, 830 through 839, 843, and 845, Square 370, bounded by 9th Street, N.W., 10th Street, N.W., L Street, N.W., and Massachusetts Avenue, N.W.

(2)

“Project” means the financing, refinancing, or reimbursing of costs incurred for the acquisition, construction, installing, and equipping of a hotel having approximately 1,100 rooms and suites, meeting and ballroom space, and other ancillary facilities customarily found in convention center hotels.

(b)

All transfers of real property in the New Convention Center Hotel TIF Area pursuant to the project and through the date that is 6 months after the effective date of the lease authorized under [part C of subchapter I of Chapter 12 of Title 10] and any transfer by the District of Lot 45 in Square 374 in connection with the project shall be exempt from the taxes imposed by §§ 42-1103 and 47-903.

Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 115(b), 53 DCR 5430
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-294, § 14, 54 DCR 1086
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-144, § 4, 55 DCR 2527
Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-339, § 3, 56 DCR 947
D.C. Law 16-294 made a technical correction that resulted in no change in text.
D.C. Law 17-144 rewrote the section.
Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-228, in subsec. (b), inserted “shall be exempt from the taxes imposed by §§ 42-1103 and 47-903” at the end of the subsection.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 17-228 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 115(b) of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).
For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 3 of New Convention Center Hotel Technical Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-412, June 18, 2008, 55 DCR 7026).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of New Convention Center Hotel Combined Technical Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-604, December 16, 2008, 56 DCR 17).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of New Convention Center Hotel Technical Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-28, March 16, 2009, 56 DCR 2319).